da: Sportsartikler > Indendørsspil > Bowling: Tasker til bowlingkugler; Vedligeholdelsesudstyr til bowlingbolde; Stativer og holdere til bowlingbolde; Bowlingkugler; Bowlinghandsker; Bowlingkegler; Bowlingsæt; Tilbehør til bowlingsko; Bowlingsko; Bowlinghåndklæder og -skind; Trænings- og hjælpeudstyr til bowling; Håndledsstøtte til bowling
hu: Sportszerek > Beltéri játékok > Bowling: Bowlinggolyó-táskák; Bowlinggolyó-karbantartó anyagok; Bowlinggolyó-állványok és -tartók; Bowlinggolyók; Bowlingkesztyűk; Bowlingbábuk; Bowlingkészletek; Bowlingcipő-kiegészítők; Bowlingcipők; Bowling törölközők és törlőkendők; Bowling edző- és segédeszközök; Bowling-csuklótámaszok
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Παιχνίδια εσωτερικού χώρου > Μπόουλινγκ: Τσάντες για μπάλες μπόουλινγκ; Αναλώσιμα συντήρησης μπαλών μπόουλινγκ; Ράφια και βάσεις μπαλών μπόουλινγκ; Μπάλες μπόουλινγκ; Γάντια μπόουλινγκ; Κορίνες για μπόουλινγκ; Σετ μπόουλινγκ; Αξεσουάρ παπουτσιών μπόουλινγκ; Παπούτσια μπόουλινγκ; Πετσέτες και πανιά μπόουλινγκ; Προπονητικός και βοηθητικός εξοπλισμός μπόουλινγκ; Υποστηρίγματα καρπού μπόουλινγκ
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Indoorové aktivity > Bowling: Tašky na bowlingové koule; Potřeby pro údržbu bowlingových koulí; Stojany a držáky na bowlingové koule; Bowlingové koule; Bowlingové rukavice; Bowlingové kuželky; Bowlingové sady; Příslušenství k bowlingové obuvi; Bowlingová obuv; Bowlingové utěrky a podložky; Tréninkové a asistenční pomůcky na bowling; Bowlingové bandáže na zápěstí
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Các môn thi đấu trong nhà > Bowling: Túi đựng bóng bowling; Đồ dùng bảo dưỡng bóng bowling; Giá & kệ để bóng bowling; Bóng bowling; Găng tay chơi bowling; Ky bowling; Bộ chơi bowling; Phụ kiện giày bowling; Giày bowling; Khăn lau bóng bowling; Thiết bị tập luyện & hỗ trợ bowling; Băng đeo bảo vệ cổ tay chơi bowling
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室內運動 > 保齡球: 保齡球袋; 保齡球保養用品; 保齡球架與置球座; 保齡球用球; 保齡球手套; 保齡球瓶; 保齡球組; 保齡球鞋配件; 保齡球鞋; 保齡球毛巾與擦球布; 保齡球訓練與輔助設備; 保齡球護腕
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Igre v zaprtih prostorih > Bowling: Torbe za žoge za bowling; Potrebščine za vzdrževanje žog za bowling; Stojala in držala za žoge za bowling; Žoge za bowling; Rokavice za bowling; Keglji za bowling; Kompleti za bowling; Dodatki za čevlje za bowling; Čevlji za bowling; Brisače in krpe za bowling; Oprema za vadbo bowlinga in pomožna oprema; Opore za zapestje za bowling
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Игри на закрито > Боулинг: Чанти за топки за боулинг; Консумативи за поддръжка на боулинг топки; Стелажи и рафтове за топки за боулинг; Топки за боулинг; Ръкавици за боулинг; Кегли за боулинг; Комплекти за боулинг; Аксесоари за обувки за боулинг; Обувки за боулинг; Кърпи и гюдерии за боулинг; Тренировъчно и помощно оборудване за боулинг; Опори за китката за боулинг
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Kambario žaidimai > Boulingas: Boulingo kamuolių krepšiai; Boulingo kamuolių priežiūros priemonės; Boulingo kamuoliukų stelažas ir laikikliai; Boulingo kamuoliai; Boulingo pirštinės; Boulingo kėgliai; Boulingo rinkiniai; Boulingo batų priedai; Boulingo batai; Boulingo rankšluosčiai ir šlepetės; Boulingo treniruotės ir pagalbinė įranga; Boulingo riešo apsaugos
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Gry towarzyskie > Kręglarstwo: Pokrowce na kule do kręgli; Środki do konserwacji kul do kręgli; Stojaki i uchwyty na kule do kręgli; Kule do kręgli; Rękawice do gry w kręgle; Kręgle; Zestawy do kręgli; Akcesoria do butów do kręgli; Buty do kręgli; Ręczniki i irchy do kręgli; Sprzęt treningowy i wspomagający do kręgli; Ochraniacze nadgarstków do gry w kręgle
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > เกมในร่ม > โบว์ลิ่ง: ถุงใส่ลูกโบว์ลิ่ง; อุปกรณ์ดูแลรักษาลูกโบว์ลิ่ง; ชั้นและแท่นวางลูกโบว์ลิ่ง; ลูกโบวลิ่ง; ถุงมือโบวลิ่ง; พินโบลิ่ง; ชุดโบว์ลิ่ง; อุปกรณ์เสริมรองเท้าโบว์ลิ่ง; รองเท้าโบว์ลิ่ง; ผ้าขนหนูและผ้าชามัวร์เช็ดลูกโบว์ลิ่ง; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมและช่วยเล่นโบว์ลิ่ง; ปลอกรัดข้อมือโยนโบวลิ่ง
ja: スポーツ用品 > 室内競技・室内ゲーム > ボウリング: ボウリングバッグ; ボウリングボール用メンテナンス用品; ボウリングボールラック・ホルダー; ボウリングボール; ボウリング用グローブ; ボウリングピン; ボウリングセット; ボウリングシューズ用アクセサリー; ボウリングシューズ; ボウリング用タオル・シャミー; ボウリング用トレーニング・補助器具; ボウリング用リストサポート
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Jogos em interior > Bowling: Sacos para bolas de bilhar; Materiais de manutenção de bolas de bowling; Estantes e suportes de bolas de bowling; Bolas de bowling; Luvas de bowling; Pinos de bowling; Conjuntos de bowling; Acessórios para sapatos de bowling; Sapatos de bowling; Toalhas e panos de bowling; Equipamento de treino e assistência de bowling; Suportes de pulso para bowling
de: Sportartikel > Indoor - Aktivitäten > Bowling: Bowlingtaschen; Bowlingball-Pflegeprodukte; Bowlingball-Ständer & -Halterungen; Bowlingkugeln; Bowlinghandschuhe; Bowlingkegel; Bowling-Sets; Bowlingschuh-Zubehör; Bowlingschuhe; Bowling-Handtücher & -Poliertücher; Bowling-Training & -Hilfsmittel; Bowling-Handgelenkstützen
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 室内游戏 > 保龄球用品: 保龄球袋; 保龄球保养用品; 保龄球存放架与支架; 保龄球; 保龄球手套; 保龄球瓶; 保龄球套装; 保龄球鞋配件; 保龄球鞋; 保龄球毛巾与擦球布; 保龄球训练与辅助设备; 保龄球护腕
fr: Équipements sportifs > Jeux d’intérieur > Bowling: Sacs de boules de bowling; Matériel d’entretien pour boules de bowling; Racks et supports pour boules de bowling; Boules de bowling; Gants de bowling; Quilles de bowling; Sets de bowling; Accessoires pour chaussures de bowling; Chaussures de bowling; Serviettes et peaux de chamois de bowling; Matériel d’entraînement et d’assistance au bowling; Protège-poignets de bowling
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > İç Mekan Sporları > Bowling: Bowling Top Çantaları; Bowling topu bakım malzemeleri; Bowling topu rafları ve stantları; Bowling Topları; Bowling Eldivenleri; Bowling Lobutları; Bowling Setleri; Bowling ayakkabısı aksesuarları; Bowling ayakkabıları; Bowling havluları ve güderileri; Bowling antrenman ve yardımcı ekipmanları; Bowling Bileklikleri
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Sisäpelit > Keilailu: Keilapallokassit; Keilapallojen huoltotarvikkeet; Keilapallotelineet ja -pidikkeet; Keilapallot; Keilailuhanskat; Keilat; Keilaussetit; Keilakenkien lisävarusteet; Keilakengät; Keilailupyyhkeet ja -säämiskät; Keilailun harjoittelu- ja apuvälineet; Rannetuet keilailuun
ru: Спортивные товары > Игры в помещении > Боулинг: Сумки для шаров для боулинга; Средства для ухода за шарами для боулинга; Стойки и держатели для шаров для боулинга; Шары для боулинга; Перчатки для боулинга; Кегли для боулинга; Наборы для боулинга; Аксессуары для обуви для боулинга; Обувь для боулинга; Полотенца и салфетки для боулинга; Тренировочное и вспомогательное оборудование для боулинга; Фиксаторы для запястья для боулинга
nb: Sportsutstyr > Innendørsspill > Bowling: Bowlingkulevesker; Vedlikeholdsutstyr for bowlingballer; Stativer og holdere for bowlingballer; Bowlingkuler; Bowlinghansker; Bowlingpins; Bowlingsett; Tilbehør til bowlingsko; Bowlingsko; Bowlinghåndklær og -kluter; Trenings- og hjelpeutstyr for bowling; Håndleddstøtter for bowling
it: Articoli sportivi > Giochi indoor > Bowling: Borse per palle da bowling; Articoli per la manutenzione delle palle da bowling; Scaffali e supporti per palle da bowling; Palle da bowling; Guanti da bowling; Birilli da bowling; Set da bowling; Accessori per scarpe da bowling; Scarpe da bowling; Asciugamani e panni da bowling; Attrezzatura per allenamento e supporto bowling; Guantini per bowling
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Interiérové hry > Bowling: Tašky na bowlingové gule; Potreby na údržbu bowlingových gúľ; Držiaky na bowlingové gule; Bowlingové gule; Bowlingové rukavice; Bowlingové kolky; Bowlingové súpravy; Príslušenstvo k bowlingovej obuvi; Bowlingové topánky; Bowlingové uteráky a návleky na topánky; Tréningové a pomocné vybavenie pre bowling; Bowlingové chrániče zápästia
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Jocuri de interior > Bowling: Huse pentru mingi de bowling; Consumabile de întreținere pentru mingi de bowling; Rafturi și suporturi pentru mingea de bowling; Mingi de bowling; Mănuși de bowling; Popice de bowling; Seturi de bowling; Accesorii pentru încălțămintea de bowling; Pantofi de bowling; Prosoape și piele de șamoa pentru bowling; Echipamente de antrenament și asistență pentru bowling; Suporturi pentru încheietură pentru bowling
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Jogos internos > Boliche: Sacos de bolas de boliche; Suprimentos de manutenção para bolas de boliche; Suportes e prateleiras para bolas de boliche; Bolas de boliche; Luvas de boliche; Pinos de boliche; Conjuntos de boliche; Acessórios para sapatos de boliche; Sapatos de boliche; Toalhas e flanelas de boliche; Equipamentos de treinamento e assistência para boliche; Munhequeiras de boliche
en: Sporting Goods > Indoor Games > Bowling: Bowling Ball Bags; Bowling Ball Maintenance Supplies; Bowling Ball Racks & Holders; Bowling Balls; Bowling Gloves; Bowling Pins; Bowling Sets; Bowling Shoe Accessories; Bowling Shoes; Bowling Towels & Shammies; Bowling Training & Assistive Equipment; Bowling Wrist Supports
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Juegos de interior > Bolos: Bolsas para bolas de bowling; Suministros de mantenimiento para bolas de bolos; Soportes y estantes para bolas de bolos; Bolas de bowling; Guantes de bowling; Bolos de bowling; Juegos de bolos; Accesorios para zapatos de bolos; Zapatos de bolos; Toallas y paños para bolos; Equipos de asistencia y entrenamiento para bolos; Muñequeras de bowling
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Igre u zatvorenom > Kuglanje: Torbe za kugle za kuglanje; Pribor za održavanje kugle za kuglanje; Stalci i držači kugle za kuglanje; Kugle za kuglanje; Rukavice za kuglanje; Čunjevi za kuglanje; Setovi za kuglanje; Dodaci za obuću za kuglanje; Cipele za kuglanje; Ručnici i krpice za kuglanje; Oprema za vježbanje i pomoćna oprema za kuglanje; Potpora za ručni zglob za kuglanje
sv: Sportartiklar > Inomhussporter > Bowling: Bowlingklotväskor; Underhållsprodukter för bowlingklot; Ställ och hållare för bowlingklot; Bowlingklot; Bowlinghandskar; Bowlingkäglor; Bowlingset; Tillbehör till bowlingskor; Bowlingskor; Bowlinghanddukar och putsdukar; Tränings- och hjälpmedel för bowling; Handledsband för bowling
nl: Sportartikelen > Binnenspelletjes > Bowling: Bowlingbaltassen; Bowlingbalonderhoudsartikelen; Bowlingbalrekken en -houders; Bowlingballen; Bowlinghandschoenen; Bowlingkegels; Bowlingsets; Bowlingschoenaccessoires; Bowlingschoenen; Bowlinghanddoeken en -zemen; Bowlingtrainings- en hulpmiddelen; Polssteunen voor bowlen
ko: 스포츠용품 > 실내용 게임 > 볼링: 볼링공 가방; 볼링공 관리 용품; 볼링공 랙 및 홀더; 볼링 공; 볼링용 장갑; 볼링핀; 볼링 세트; 볼링화 액세서리; 볼링화; 볼링 타월 및 섀미; 볼링 훈련 및 보조 장비; 볼링 손목 보호대